California statutes. Revenue and Taxation Code
(c) The collection cost recovery fee imposed pursuant to this section shall be collected in the same manner as the collection of any other tax imposed by this part.

(d) (1) If the
 California Department of Tax and Fee Administration finds that a person’s failure to pay any amount under this part is due to reasonable cause and circumstances beyond the person’s control, and occurred notwithstanding the exercise of ordinary care and the absence of willful neglect, the person shall be relieved of the collection cost recovery fee provided by this section.

(2) Any person seeking to be relieved of the collection cost recovery fee shall file with the California Department of Tax and Fee Administration a statement under penalty of perjury setting forth the facts upon which the person bases the claim for relief.

(e) Subdivision (a)
 shall be operative with respect to a demand notice for payment which is mailed on or after January 1, 2011.

(f) Collection cost recovery fee revenues shall be deposited in the same manner as revenues derived from any other tax imposed by this part.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2021, Ch. 432, Sec. 27.   (SB 824)   Effective January 1, 2022.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 5. Seizure and Sale [30355. - 30358.]

30355.

Whenever any person is delinquent in the payment of the obligations imposed under this part, the board or its authorized representative may seize any property, real or personal, subject to the lien of the tax and thereafter sell the property, or a sufficient part of it, at public auction to pay the tax due together with any interest and penalties imposed for the delinquency and any costs incurred on account of the seizure and sale.

(History: Added by Stats. 2003, Ch. 890, Sec. 11.   Effective January 1, 2004.)
-------------------------------------------

30356.

Notice of the sale and the time and place thereof shall be given in writing at least 20 days before the date set for the sale to the delinquent person and to all persons who have an interest of record in the property seized. The notice shall be personally served or enclosed in an envelope addressed to the person at his or her last known residence or place of business in this state. If not personally served, the notice shall be deposited in the United States mail, postage prepaid. The notice shall be published pursuant to Section 6063 of the Government Code, in
 a newspaper of general circulation published in the city in which the property or a part thereof is situated if any part thereof is situated in a city or, if not, in a newspaper of general circulation published in the county in which the property or a part thereof is located. Notice shall also be posted in both of the following manners:

(a) One public place in the city in which the interest in property is to be sold if it is to be sold in a city or, if not to be sold in a city, one public place in the county in which the interest in the property is to be sold.

(b) One conspicuous place on the property. The notice shall contain a description of the property to be sold, a statement of the amount due, including tax, penalties, interest, and costs, the name of the person, and the further statement that unless the amount is paid on or before the time fixed in the notice of sale, the
 property, or so much of it as may be necessary, will be sold in accordance with law and the notice.

(History: Added by Stats. 2003, Ch. 890, Sec. 11.   Effective January 1, 2004.)
-------------------------------------------

30357.

At any sale the board or its authorized agent shall sell the property in accordance with the law and the notice and shall deliver to the purchaser a bill of sale for the personal property and a deed for any real property sold. The bill of sale or deed vests title in the purchaser. The unsold portion of any property seized may be left at the place of sale at the risk of the taxpayer.

(History: Added by Stats. 2003, Ch. 890, Sec. 11.   Effective January 1, 2004.)
-------------------------------------------

30358.

If upon any sale the moneys received exceed the amount due to the state from the taxpayer, the board shall return the excess to the taxpayer and obtain his or her receipt. If any person having an interest in or lien upon the property files with the board prior to the sale notice of his or her interest or lien, the board shall withhold payment of any excess pending a determination of the rights of the respective parties to the excess moneys by a court of competent jurisdiction. If for any reason the receipt of the taxpayer is not available, the board shall
 deposit the excess moneys with the Controller, as trustee for the taxpayer, his or her heirs, successors, or assigns.

(History: Added by Stats. 2003, Ch. 890, Sec. 11.   Effective January 1, 2004.)
-------------------------------------------



  CHAPTER 6. Overpayments and Refunds [30361. - 30421.]



  ARTICLE 1. Claim for Refund [30361. - 30367.]

30361.

If the department determines that any amount not required to be paid under this part has been paid by any person, the department shall set forth that fact in its records and certify the amount collected in excess of the amount legally due and the person from whom it was collected or by whom it was paid. The excess amount collected or paid shall be credited by the department on any amounts then due and payable from the person from whom the excess amount was collected or by whom it was paid under this part, and the balance shall be refunded to the person, or the person’s successors, administrators, or executors. Any determination by the department pursuant to this section with respect to an amount in excess of fifty thousand dollars ($50,000) shall be available as a public record for at least 10 days after the
 effective date of that determination.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2022, Ch. 474, Sec. 33.   (SB 1496)   Effective January 1, 2023.)
-------------------------------------------

30361.5.

When an amount represented by a person to a customer as constituting reimbursement for taxes upon the distribution of tobacco products pursuant to this part is computed upon an amount that is not taxable or is in excess of the tax amount and is actually paid by the customer to the person, the amount so paid shall be returned by the person to the customer upon notification by the State Board of Equalization or the customer that an excess has been ascertained. If the person fails or refuses to do so, the amount so paid, if knowingly or mistakenly computed by
 the person upon an amount that is not subject to the tax imposed by this part or that is in excess of the tax amount, shall be remitted by that person to this state. Those amounts remitted to the state by the person shall be credited by the board to any amounts due and payable from that customer that are subject to this part and that are based on the same activity, and the balance, if any, shall constitute an obligation due from the person to this state.

(History: Added by Stats. 2005, Ch. 512, Sec. 6.   Effective January 1, 2006.)
-------------------------------------------

30362.

(a) Except as provided in subdivision (b) no refund shall be approved by the board after three years from the 25th day after the close of the monthly period for which the overpayment was made, or, with respect to a determination made under Chapter 4 of this part, after six months from the date the determination becomes final, or after six months from the date of overpayment, whichever period expires the later, unless a claim therefor is filed within the board within such period. No credit shall be approved by the board after the expiration of such period unless a claim for credit is filed with the board within such period, or unless the credit
 relates to a period for which a waiver is given pursuant to Section 30208.

(b) A refund may be approved by the board for any period for which a waiver is given under Section 30208 if a claim therefor is filed with the board before the expiration of the period agreed upon.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1968, Ch. 469.)
-------------------------------------------

30362.1.

(a) The limitation period specified in Section 30362 shall be suspended during any period of a person’s life that the person is financially disabled.

(b) (1) For purposes of subdivision (a), a person is financially disabled if the person is unable to manage his or her financial affairs by reason of medically determinable physical or mental impairment of the person which can be expected to result in death or which has lasted or can be expected to last
 for a continuous period of not less than 12 months. A person shall not be considered to have an impairment unless proof of the existence thereof is furnished in the form and manner as the board may require.

(2) A person shall not be treated as financially disabled during any period that the person’s spouse or any other person is authorized to act on behalf of the person in financial matters.

(c) This section applies to periods of disability commencing before, on, or after the effective date of the act adding this section, but does not apply to any claim for refund that (without regard to this section) is barred by the operation or rule of law, including res judicata, as of the effective date of the act adding this section.

(History: Added by Stats. 2000, Ch. 1052, Sec. 27.   Effective January 1, 2001.)
-------------------------------------------

30362.2.

(a) A claim for refund that is otherwise valid under Sections 30362 and 30363 that is made in the case in which the amount of tax determined has not been paid in full shall be deemed to be a timely filed claim for refund with respect to all subsequent payments applied to that determination.

(b) For purposes of this section, “amount of tax determined” means an amount of tax, interest, or penalty,
 with respect to a single determination made under Article 2 (commencing with Section 30201), Article 3 (commencing with Section 30221), or Article 4 (commencing with Section 30241) of Chapter 4.

(c) This section shall apply to all claims for refund on or after the effective date of the act adding this section.

(History: Added by Stats. 2016, Ch. 98, Sec. 3.   (AB 1856)   Effective January 1, 2017.)
-------------------------------------------

30363.

Every claim for refund or credit shall be in writing and shall state the specific grounds upon which it is founded.

(History: Added by Stats. 1959, Ch. 1040.)
-------------------------------------------

30364.

Failure to file a claim within the time prescribed in this article constitutes a waiver of all demands against the State on account of the overpayment.

(History: Added by Stats. 1959, Ch. 1040.)
-------------------------------------------

30365.

Within 30 days after disallowing any claim in whole or in part, the board shall serve written notice of its action on the claimant in the manner prescribed for the service of a notice of a deficiency determination.

(History: Added by Stats. 1959, Ch. 1040.)
-------------------------------------------

30366.

Interest shall be computed, allowed, and paid upon any overpayment of any amount of tax at the modified adjusted rate per month established pursuant to Section 6591.5, from the 26th day of the calendar month following the period during which the overpayment was made. In addition, a refund or credit shall be made of any interest imposed upon the claimant with respect to the amount being refunded or credited.

The interest shall be paid as follows:

(a) In
 the case of a refund, to the 25th day of the calendar month following the date upon which the claimant, if he or she has not already filed a claim, is notified by the board that a claim may be filed or the date upon which the claim is approved by the board, whichever date is earlier.

(b) In the case of a credit, to the same date as that to which interest is computed on the tax or amount against which the credit is applied.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1997, Ch. 620, Sec. 9.   Effective January 1, 1998.)
-------------------------------------------

30367.

(a) If the board determines that any overpayment has been made intentionally or by reason of carelessness, it shall not allow any interest thereon.

(b) If any person who has filed a claim for refund requests the board to defer action on the claim, the board, as a condition to deferring action, may require the claimant to waive interest for the period during which the person requests the board to defer action on the claim.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1998, Ch. 420, Sec. 6.   Effective January 1, 1999.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 2. Recovery of Erroneous Refunds [30381. - 30384.]

30381.

(a) The board may recover any refund or part thereof that is erroneously made, and any credit or part thereof that is erroneously allowed, in an action brought in a court of competent jurisdiction in the county of Sacramento in the name of the people of the State of California.

(b) As an alternative to subdivision (a), the board may recover any refund or part thereof that is erroneously made, and any credit or part thereof that is erroneously allowed. In recovering any
 erroneous refund or credit, the board may, in its discretion, issue a deficiency determination in accordance with Article 3 (commencing with Section 30173) of Chapter 3.5, or Article 2 (commencing with Section 30201) or Article 4 (commencing with Section 30241) of Chapter 4. Except in the case of fraud, the deficiency determination shall be made by the board within three years from the date of the Controller’s warrant or date of credit.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1998, Ch. 609, Sec. 24.   Effective January 1, 1999.)
-------------------------------------------

30382.

In any action brought pursuant to subdivision (a) of Section 30381, the court may, with the consent of the Attorney General, order a change in the place of trial.

(History: Added by Stats. 1998, Ch. 609, Sec. 25.   Effective January 1, 1999.)
-------------------------------------------

30383.

The Attorney General shall prosecute any action brought pursuant to subdivision (a) of Section 30381, and the provisions of the Code of Civil Procedure relating to service of summons, pleadings, proofs, trials, and appeals shall apply to the proceedings.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1998, Ch. 609, Sec. 26.   Effective January 1, 1999.)
-------------------------------------------

30384.

(a) Notwithstanding any other provision of this part, if the department finds that neither the person liable for payment of tax nor any party related to that person has in any way caused an erroneous refund for which an action for recovery is provided under Section 30381, no interest shall be imposed on the amount of that erroneous refund until 30 days after the date on which the department serves a notice of determination for repayment of the erroneous refund to the person. The act of filing a claim for refund shall not be considered as causing the erroneous refund.

(b) This section shall be operative for any action for recovery under Section 30381 on or after January 1, 2000.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2024, Ch. 499, Sec. 43.   (SB 1528)   Effective January 1, 2025.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 3. Suit for Refund [30401. - 30407.]

30401.

No injunction or writ of mandate or other legal or equitable process shall issue in any suit, action, or proceeding in any court against this State or against any officer of the State to prevent or enjoin the collection under this part of any tax or any amount of tax required to be collected.

(History: Added by Stats. 1959, Ch. 1040.)
-------------------------------------------

30402.

No suit or proceeding shall be maintained in any court for the recovery of any amount alleged to have been erroneously or illegally determined or collected unless a claim for refund or credit has been duly filed.

(History: Added by Stats. 1959, Ch. 1040.)
-------------------------------------------

30403.

Within 90 days after the mailing of the notice of the board’s action upon a claim for refund or credit, the claimant may bring an action against the board on the grounds set forth in the claim in a court of competent jurisdiction in any city or county in the State in which the Attorney General has an office for the recovery of the whole or any part of the amount with respect to which the claim has been disallowed.

(History: Added by Stats. 1959, Ch. 1040.)
-------------------------------------------

30404.

If the board fails to mail notice of its action on a claim within six months after the claim is filed, the claimant may, prior to the mailing of notice by the board of its action on the claim, consider the claim disallowed and bring an action against the board on the grounds set forth in the claim for the recovery of the whole or any part of the amount claimed as an overpayment.

(History: Added by Stats. 1959, Ch. 1040.)
-------------------------------------------

30405.

Failure to bring a suit or an action within the time specified in this article constitutes a waiver of all demands against the State on account of an alleged overpayment.

(History: Added by Stats. 1959, Ch. 1040.)
-------------------------------------------

30406.

If judgment is rendered for the plaintiff, the amount of the judgment shall first be credited on any amounts due from the plaintiff under this part, and the balance of the judgment shall be refunded to the plaintiff. In any judgment, interest shall be allowed at the modified adjusted rate per annum established pursuant to Section 6591.5, upon the amount found to have been illegally collected from the date of payment of the amount to the date of allowance of credit on account of the judgment or to a date preceding the date of the refund warrant by not more than 30 days, the date to be determined by the board.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1984, Ch. 1020, Sec. 37.   Operative July 1, 1985, by Sec. 65 of Ch. 1020.)
-------------------------------------------

30407.

A judgment shall not be rendered in favor of the plaintiff in any action brought against the board to recover any amount paid when the action is brought by or in the name of an assignee of the person making the payment or by any person other than the person making the payment.

(History: Added by Stats. 1959, Ch. 1040.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 4. Cancellations [30421. - 30421.]

30421.

If any amount has been illegally determined, the department shall set forth that fact in its records, certify the amount determined to be in excess of the amount legally due and the person against whom the determination was made, and authorize the cancellation of the amount upon the records of the department. Any determination by the department pursuant to this section with respect to an amount in excess of fifty thousand dollars ($50,000) shall be available as a public record for at least 10 days after the effective date of that determination.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2022, Ch. 474, Sec. 34.   (SB 1496)   Effective January 1, 2023.)
-------------------------------------------



  CHAPTER 7. Requirements for Transporters [30431. - 30432.]

30431.

Any transporter desiring to possess or acquire for transportation or transport upon the highways, roads or streets of this state more than 400 cigarettes which are not contained in packages to which are affixed California cigarette stamps or meter impressions or tobacco products with a value of twenty-five dollars ($25) or more shall obtain a permit from the board authorizing such transporter to possess or acquire for transportation or transport the cigarettes or tobacco products, and he shall have the permit in the transporting vehicle during the period of transportation of the cigarettes or tobacco products. The application
 for the permit shall be in such form and shall contain such information as may be prescribed by the board. The board may issue a permit for a single load or shipment or for a number of loads or shipments to be transported under specified conditions.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1989, Ch. 634, Sec. 35.   Effective September 21, 1989.)
-------------------------------------------

30432.

Each transporter who shall transport or possess or acquire for the purpose of transporting upon the highways, roads or streets of this state more than 400 cigarettes which are not contained in packages to which are affixed California cigarette tax stamps or meter impressions or tobacco products with a value of twenty-five dollars ($25) or more is required to have in the transporting vehicle during the period of transportation invoices, bills of lading or delivery tickets covering the cigarettes or tobacco products being transported which shall show the name and address of the consignor or seller, the name and address of the
 consignee or purchaser and the quantity and brands of the cigarettes or tobacco products transported.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1989, Ch. 634, Sec. 36.   Effective September 21, 1989.)
-------------------------------------------



  CHAPTER 7.5. Seizure and Forfeiture [30435. - 30449.]

30435.

(a) An employee of the board, upon presentation of the appropriate identification and credentials, is authorized to enter into, and conduct an inspection of any building, facility, site, or place described in subdivision (b).

(b) Any building, facility, site, or place at which cigarette or tobacco products are sold, produced, or stored, or any building, facility, site, or place for which there is evidence of either the evasion of the taxes imposed under this part, or the
 failure to comply with the requirements of the Master Settlement Agreement, as defined in subdivision (e) of Section 104556 of the Health and Safety Code, including, but not limited to, Section 30165.1.

(c) Any inspection performed under the authority of this section shall be performed in a reasonable manner and at a reasonable time, taking into consideration the normal business hours of the building, facility, site, or place that is inspected.

(d) Any person that refuses to allow an inspection authorized under this section is subject to the penalty imposed by Section 30471.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2006, Ch. 501, Sec. 19.   Effective January 1, 2007.)
-------------------------------------------

30436.

The following property, upon seizure by the board, is hereby forfeited to the state:

(a) Cigarettes or tobacco products transported upon the highways, roads, or streets of this state in violation of Section 30431 or Section 30432.

(b) Cigarettes not contained in packages to which are affixed California cigarette tax stamp or meter impressions or tobacco products upon which the tobacco products surtax has not been paid, which are
 offered for sale, possessed, kept, stored, or owned by any person with the intent of the person to sell the cigarettes or tobacco products without payment of the taxes imposed by this part.

(c) Any cigarette or tobacco product vending machine, together with the cigarettes, tobacco products, money or other contents thereof, that has been loaded, in whole or in part, with packages of cigarettes that do not have California cigarette tax stamps or meter impressions affixed or tobacco products upon which the tobacco products surtax has not been paid.

(d) Cigarettes contained in packages to which are affixed California cigarette tax stamps or meter impressions in violation of Section 30163.

(e) Cigarettes or tobacco products to which are affixed California cigarette tax stamps or meter impressions, or for which tax is paid
 pursuant to Sections 30123 and 30131.2, in violation of Section 30165.1, regardless of whether the violation is subject to the defense described in paragraph (2) of subdivision (i) of Section 30165.1.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2003, Ch. 890, Sec. 13.   Effective January 1, 2004.)
-------------------------------------------

30437.

Notice of the seizure and forfeiture of the property described in Section 30436 shall be given by the board as follows:

(a) Notice shall be given by personal service or by certified mail to all persons known by the board to have any right, title or interest in the property.

(b) (1) Except as provided in paragraph (2), the board shall include a notice of seizure and forfeiture on its Web site for a period of six
 months from the notice of seizure.

(2) Web site notification is not required when the amount of cigarettes seized is less than 61 cartons of 200 cigarettes each or an equivalent amount of tobacco products.

(c) Notice shall include a description of the property, the reason for the seizure, and the time and place of the seizure.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2004, Ch. 82, Sec. 10.   Effective June 30, 2004.)
-------------------------------------------

30438.

Any person owning or claiming any interest in the property may file a verified petition with the board stating his interest in the property and requesting the release or recovery of the property on the ground that the property was erroneously or illegally seized. Any person served personally or by mail under Section 30437 shall file the petition within 20 days from the date of the personal service upon him or the date of the mailing of the notice to him. Any person not served personally or by mail under that section shall file the petition within 20 days from the date of publication of the notice. The failure of any such person to file a timely verified petition shall
 constitute a bar to his right to any interest in the property, except insofar as the rights of any such person may be established in an action filed by the board under this chapter.

(History: Added by Stats. 1967, Ch. 963.)
-------------------------------------------

30439.

If the board determines that the property was seized erroneously or illegally, it shall order the release of the property. If the board denies the petition for the release or recovery of the property, notice of the denial shall be mailed within five days to the petitioner.

(History: Added by Stats. 1967, Ch. 963.)
-------------------------------------------

30440.

Within 20 days from the date of the mailing of the board’s notice of denial of the petition, the petitioner may file an action against the board in the Superior Court of the County of Sacramento for the release or recovery of the property on the ground that the property was erroneously or illegally seized. The failure of the petitioner to file a timely action shall constitute a bar to his right to any interest in the property, except insofar as the rights of the petitioner may be established in an action filed by the board under this chapter. The court shall determine whether the seizure of the property was in accordance with law and shall enter an appropriate order for the
 disposition of the property.

(History: Added by Stats. 1967, Ch. 963.)
-------------------------------------------

30441.

Within 20 days after the seizure of property under this chapter, any person owning or claiming an interest in the property may offer to deposit with the board an amount of money equal to the fair market value of the property as determined by the board. If the board is satisfied that the property will not be used, transported or sold in violation of any provision of this part, the board shall accept the deposit and release the property. The money so deposited shall be held by the board in lieu of the seized property and shall be treated in all respects in the same manner as that property.

(History: Added by Stats. 1967, Ch. 963.)
-------------------------------------------

30442.

Notwithstanding any other provisions of this chapter, upon making a seizure of property under Section 30436, the board may at any time prior to the sale or other disposition of the property commence an action to determine the rights of the state to the property. The action shall be commenced in the superior court of the county in which the seizure was made by petitioning the court for a judgment confirming the seizure and forfeiture of the property. The petition shall describe the property, the grounds for seizure and the time and place of the seizure.

(History: Added by Stats. 1967, Ch. 963.)
-------------------------------------------

30443.

Copies of the petition shall be served personally or by registered or certified mail on all persons known by the board to have any right, title or interest in the property seized. Unknown persons, or any known person who cannot be found, having any right, title or interest in the property shall be served by one publication of the petition in the manner prescribed for publication of the notice of seizure and forfeiture under Section 30437.

(History: Added by Stats. 1967, Ch. 963.)
-------------------------------------------

30444.

Any person claiming any right, title or interest in the property may within 20 days after service of the petition upon him file an answer to the petition. The answer shall allege facts to show the interest of the claimant in the property and to establish that the seizure and forfeiture was erroneous or illegal. A copy of the answer shall be served on the board at its office in Sacramento.

(History: Added by Stats. 1967, Ch. 963.)
-------------------------------------------

30445.

If at the expiration of 20 days after the petition has been personally served, mailed or published there is no answer on file, the court shall within 30 days thereafter receive evidence in support of the seizure and forfeiture and shall, upon being satisfied of the validity thereof, enter judgment confirming the seizure and forfeiture.

(History: Added by Stats. 1967, Ch. 963.)
-------------------------------------------

30446.

If a timely answer has been filed, the proceeding shall be set for hearing on a day within 30 days after the expiration of the period for filing of an answer. Notice of the hearing shall be given by the clerk of the court to each person filing an answer.

(History: Added by Stats. 1967, Ch. 963.)
-------------------------------------------

30447.

At the time set for the hearing any person having a timely answer on file may offer evidence to establish that the seizure and forfeiture of the property was erroneous or illegal.

(History: Added by Stats. 1967, Ch. 963.)
-------------------------------------------

30448.

The court shall determine whether the seizure of the property was in accordance with law and enter an appropriate order for the disposition of the property.

(History: Added by Stats. 1967, Ch. 963.)
-------------------------------------------

30449.

(a) Except as provided in subdivision (b), (c), or (d), any property, except money, forfeited to the state under this chapter shall be sold by the board at public auction. Notice of the sale shall be given by posting a written notice of the time and place of sale in three public places in the county where the property is to be sold for not less than 5 days nor more than 10 days before the sale. If the board is unable to sell any property forfeited to the state under this part or, if the board determines that the property is unsalable, it may destroy that property.

(b) Any property forfeited to the state pursuant to subdivision (e) of Section 30436
 shall be destroyed.

(c) Any cigarettes forfeited to the state pursuant to subdivision (b) of Section 30436 shall be destroyed.

(d) Any cigarettes, tobacco products, flavored tobacco products, or tobacco product flavor enhancers forfeited to the state pursuant to Division 8.6 (commencing with Section 22970) of the Business and Professions Code shall be destroyed.

(e) A record shall be kept of all property destroyed pursuant to this section showing the nature of the property, the quantity, the reason for, and the manner of destruction. The proceeds of the sale and any money forfeited to the state shall be deposited in the State Treasury to the credit of the General Fund.

(f) For purposes of this section, “flavored tobacco product” and “tobacco product flavor enhancer” shall have the same meaning as those terms are defined in Section 104559.5 of the Health and Safety Code.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2024, Ch. 462, Sec. 6.   (SB 1230)   Effective January 1, 2025.)
-------------------------------------------



  CHAPTER 8. Administration [30451. - 30459.8.]



  ARTICLE 1. Administration [30451. - 30457.4.]

30451.

The board shall enforce the provisions of this part and may prescribe, adopt, and enforce rules and regulations relating to the administration and enforcement of this part. The board may prescribe the extent to which any ruling or regulation shall be applied without retroactive effect.

(History: Added by Stats. 1959, Ch. 1040.)
-------------------------------------------

30452.

The board may employ accountants, auditors, investigators, assistants, and clerks necessary for the efficient administration of this part and may designate representatives to conduct hearings, or perform any other duties imposed by this part or other laws of this State upon the board.

(History: Added by Stats. 1959, Ch. 1040.)
-------------------------------------------

30453.

Every distributor and every person dealing in, transporting, or storing cigarettes or tobacco products in this state shall keep such records, receipts, invoices, and other pertinent papers with respect thereto in such form as the board may require.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1989, Ch. 634, Sec. 38.   Effective September 21, 1989.)
-------------------------------------------

30454.

(a) The department or its authorized representative may make examinations of the books, papers, records, and equipment of any person dealing in, transporting, or storing cigarettes or tobacco products and other investigations as it may deem necessary in carrying out the provisions of this part.

(b) In addition to any other reports required under this part, the department may, by rule or otherwise, require additional, other, or supplemental reports from licensed distributors, dealers, transporters, common and private carriers,
 warehouse workers, bailees, and other persons, including reports of shipments of cigarettes or tobacco products from a point outside this state to a point within this state, and prescribe the form, including verification, of the information to be given on, and the times for filing of,
 additional, other, or supplemental reports.

(c) A report required to be filed under this section or Section 376 of Title 15 of the United States Code shall be filed using electronic media. Reports shall be authenticated in a form or pursuant to methods as may be prescribed by the department.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2021, Ch. 432, Sec. 28.   (SB 824)   Effective January 1, 2022.)
-------------------------------------------

30455.

It is unlawful for the board or any person having an administrative duty under this part to make known in any manner whatever the business affairs, operations, or information obtained by an investigation of records and equipment of any person visited or examined in the discharge of official duty, or the amount or source of income, profits, losses, expenditures, or any particular thereof, set forth or disclosed in any report, or to permit any report or copy thereof or any book containing any abstract or particulars thereof to be seen or examined by any
 person. However, the Governor may, by general or special order, authorize examination of the records maintained by the board under this part by other state officers, by tax officers of another state, by the federal government, if a reciprocal arrangement exists, or by any other person.

Successors, receivers, trustees, executors, administrators, assignees, and guarantors, if directly interested, may be given information as to the items included in the measure and amounts of any unpaid tax or amounts of tax required to be collected, interest, and penalties.

Nothing in this section shall prevent the board from exchanging with officials of other states information concerning interstate shipments of cigarettes or tobacco products.

Any violation of this section is a misdemeanor and is punishable by a fine not exceeding one thousand dollars ($1,000), by imprisonment not exceeding one
 year, or by both, in the discretion of the court.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1997, Ch. 620, Sec. 10.   Effective January 1, 1998.)
-------------------------------------------

30455.5.

(a) Except as otherwise provided by law, any person who is engaged in the business of preparing, or providing services in connection with the preparation of, returns under Chapter 4 (commencing with Section 30181) of this part, or any person who for compensation prepares any such return for any other person, and who knowingly or recklessly does either of the following, shall be guilty of a misdemeanor, and, upon conviction thereof, shall be fined not more than one thousand dollars ($1,000) or imprisoned no more than one year, or both,
 together with the costs of prosecution:

(1) Discloses any information furnished to him or her for, or in connection with, the preparation of the return, or

(2) Uses that information for any purpose other than to prepare, or assist in preparing, the return.

(b) Subdivision (a) shall not apply to disclosure of information if that disclosure is made pursuant to the person’s consent or pursuant to a subpoena, court order, or other compulsory legal process.

(History: Added by Stats. 2000, Ch. 1052, Sec. 28.   Effective January 1, 2001.)
-------------------------------------------

30456.

A certificate by the board or an employee of the board stating that a notice required by this part was given by mailing or personal service shall be prima facie evidence in any administrative or judicial proceeding of the fact and regularity of the mailing or personal service in accordance with any requirement of this part for the giving of a notice. Unless otherwise specifically required, any notice provided by this part to be mailed or served may be given either by mailing or by personal service in the manner provided for giving notice of a deficiency determination.

(History: Added by Stats. 1974, Ch. 610.)
-------------------------------------------

30457.

(a) The board shall determine which taxpayer’s accounts are eligible for the managed audit program in a manner that is consistent with the efficient use of its auditing resources and the maximum effectiveness of the program.

(b) A taxpayer is not required to participate in the managed audit program.

(History: Added by Stats. 2014, Ch. 105, Sec. 11.   (AB 2009)   Effective January 1, 2015.)
-------------------------------------------

30457.1.

A taxpayer’s account is eligible for the managed audit program only if the taxpayer meets all of the following criteria:

(a) The taxpayer’s business involves few or no statutory exemptions.

(b) The taxpayer’s business involves a single or a small number of clearly defined taxability issues.

(c) The taxpayer is taxed pursuant to this part and agrees to participate in the managed audit program.

(d) The taxpayer has the resources to comply with the managed audit instructions provided by the board.

(History: Added by Stats. 2014, Ch. 105, Sec. 12.   (AB 2009)   Effective January 1, 2015.)
-------------------------------------------

30457.2.

(a) If the board selects a taxpayer’s account for a managed audit, all of the following apply:

(1) The board shall identify all of the following:

(A) The audit period covered by the managed audit.

(B) The types of transactions covered by the managed audit.

(C) The specific procedures that the taxpayer is to follow in determining any liability.

(D) The records to be reviewed by the taxpayer.
